Virginia statutes. Title 33.1. Highways, Bridges and Ferries.
Article 10.
Woodrow Wilson Bridge and Tunnel Compact.

§ 33.1-320.1.

Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 951 and 1018.

§ 33.1-320.2.

Not set out. (1996, cc. 951, 1018; 2005, c. 839.)

Editor's note.

- At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the Woodrow Wilson Bridge and Tunnel Compact, formerly set out at this location, is set out only in the Compacts volume of the Code of Virginia. For amendments to this compact, see the supplement to Compacts.